Hawaii statutes.
§319-3 Hawaii dental education plan.
(a) The department may enter into agreements with dental schools accredited by
the American Dental Association not within the jurisdiction of WICHE, for the
education of Hawaii residents.

(b) The agreements entered into under
subsection (a) shall provide among other necessary and desirable provisions
that the schools contracted with shall reserve a set number of vacancies in
each class for qualified applicants who are residents of the State of Hawaii.
The State, through the department, shall disburse moneys, on behalf of the
student, to the school, the total of which for each student shall not exceed
amounts being provided per student for a similar program under WICHE. The
agreements may contain other provisions relating to the administration of the
plan and any contracts thereunder.

(c) Subject to the limitation set by
subsection (b), any amount allotted to a student shall be disbursed directly to
the school.

(d) Any student participating in the plan
shall be responsible for financing of the student's expenses except for the
amount specified in a contract executed in conformance with this chapter. The
State shall not be implicitly or explicitly presumed to be liable or in any way
responsible for any cost of a dental education for any participating student
except under such contract.

(e) Students approved for participation in the
plan shall be residents of the State of Hawaii, and shall have met the entrance
requirements of the contracting dental school. Determination of the amount of
funds to be expended on behalf of a student approved for participation in the
plan shall be based on need and ability; provided that where there is no
demonstrated need, the State shall not be required to provide such specific sum.

(f) Students seeking participation in this
program shall be required by the department of budget and finance to execute an
agreement with the State, which shall, among other necessary and desirable
provisions, provide that upon completion of the student's dental education the
student shall either:

(1) Actively engage in professional practice or other
professional pursuits in areas with inadequate dental service, with the
department of health, or other acceptable service as determined by the director
of human services, director of health, and the director of finance, jointly, or

(2) Repay all amounts expended by the State of Hawaii
under this plan for the student's education.

(g) Neither the department of budget and
finance nor any professional dental society in the State shall influence the
selection of the qualified applicants for the plan nor the schools which the
selected applicants attend. [L 1976, c 132, pt of §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c
339, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next